Reconciliation of non-GAAP financial measures, including FFO, Adjusted FFO, Property NOI, EBITDA and Adjusted EBITDA are included in the accompanying financial tables.

Fourth Quarter 2016 Pro Forma AFFO Per Share run rate of $0.21 on an Annualized Basis, in line with management's guidance of $0.21 and the company's common stock dividend.
Completed the acquisition of twenty-three grocery-anchored shopping centers in 2016 for a total aggregate purchase price of $186 million.
Leasing spread of 3.9% on renewals-the 16th consecutive quarter of positive rent spreads.
GAAP and cash Same-store NOI  growth for the year ended December 31, 2016 of 3.7% and 2.8%, respectively.
Board of Directors has approved a reverse stock split of the company's outstanding shares of common stock at a ratio of 1-for-8.  Management expects the reverse split to take effect on March 31, 2017 at 5:00PM EDT, and begin trading on a split-adjusted basis on the Nasdaq Capital Market at the market open on April 3, 2017.
Effective April 1, 2017 WHLR amended its dividend payment schedule such that future common stock dividends will be paid quarterly commencing in July 2017 to shareholders of record on June 30, 2017. Giving effect to the reverse stock split, the distribution rate will be multiplied by 8, or $0.42 per share on a quarterly basis.
Management will announce Full-Year 2017 and First Quarter 2017 Core FFO and AFFO per share guidance on the February 28, 2017 earnings call.
VIRGINIA BEACH, Va., Feb. 27, 2017 (GLOBE NEWSWIRE) -- Wheeler Real Estate Investment Trust, Inc. (WHLR) (“Wheeler” or the “Company”) today reported operating and financial results for its year ended December 31, 2016.

2016 Fourth Quarter Highlights (all comparisons to the same prior year period unless otherwise noted)

Total revenue from continuing operations increased 30.3% or $2.8 million.
Property Net Operating Income (“NOI”) from continuing operations increased by 31.6% or $2.0 million.
Adjusted Funds from Operations ("AFFO") of $0.02 per share of the Company's common stock, $0.01 par value per share ("Common Stock") and common unit ("Operating Partnership Unit" or "OP Unit") in our operating partnership, Wheeler REIT, L.P. (the "Operating Partnership").
Average rental rate increase on renewals signed during the quarter was 3.92%.
Occupancy rate of 94.0% at December 31, 2016, compared to 94.2% at December 31, 2015.
For the three month period, the Company declared monthly cash dividends of approximately $0.0175 per share. On an annualized basis, this amounted to a dividend of $0.21 per Common Stock share and OP Unit, or a 12.4% dividend yield based on the December 30, 2016 closing price of $1.70 per share.
During the three months ended December 31, 2016, $14.4 million of net proceeds were raised in the Series D Cumulative Convertible Preferred Stock ("Series D Preferred Stock") offering.
Completed the acquisition of nine properties totaling $115 million.
Added 12th state, Pennsylvania, to the portfolio.
2016 Year-to-Date Highlights (all comparisons to prior year unless otherwise noted)

Total revenue from continuing operations increased by 59.9% or $16.5 million for the year ended December 31, 2016.
NOI from continuing operations increased by 64.9% to approximately $30.2 million for the year ended December 31, 2016.
During the year, the Company completed the acquisition of an additional 1,760,850 square feet of gross leasable area.
AFFO of $0.12 per Common Stock share and OP Unit.
As of December 31, 2016, Wheeler’s property portfolio included 64 operating properties with a gross leasable area of 4,906,511 square feet, 8 undeveloped properties totaling approximately 71 acres of land, one redevelopment property and its corporate office building. As of December 31, 2015, the Company owned 42 properties with a gross leasable area of 3,151,358 square feet, 9 undeveloped properties totaling approximately 81 acres of land, one redevelopment property and its corporate office building.
Average rental rate increase on renewals signed during the year was 4.9%.
Increased credit facility with KeyBank National Association to $75 million. The facility includes a provision that allows for expansion of the facility under certain conditions to a maximum of $100 million through syndication with other lenders.
Other income increased 116.9% to $2.1 million for the year ended December 31, 2016 as a result of development fees and leasing commissions on non-REIT properties.
Jon S. Wheeler, Chairman and Chief Executive Officer, commented, “2016 was an exceptional year for us on multiple fronts. We acquired twenty-three grocery-anchored properties for an aggregate purchase price of $186 million representing a weighted average cap rate of 8.3%. We expanded the portfolio geographically and added 1.76 million square feet of gross leasable area, now owning 74 properties and 4.6 million square feet in 12 states.

"Most importantly, we executed on our 2016 goal of achieving a run-rate of $0.21 per share in AFFO, in line with our Common Stock dividend. Management’s efforts to reduce general and administrative costs, increase value at the property level and acquire accretive acquisitions resulted in coverage of the dividend with pro forma 4Q16 AFFO for the first time in the Company’s history. We feel poised for continued success in 2017 and look forward to sharing more information about our outlook and guidance for the year on the call tomorrow morning."

2016 Fourth Quarter Financial Review

For the fourth quarter of 2016, total revenue from continuing operations increased by approximately 30.3% to $12.0 million, compared with total revenue from continuing operations of $9.2 million for the same prior year period. 
Net loss attributable to Wheeler Common Stock shareholders for the three months ended December 31, 2016 was $6.2 million, or $0.09 per basic and diluted share, compared to a net loss of $2.7 million or $0.04 per basic and diluted share, during the same 2015 period. The increase in net loss for the three months ended December 31, 2016 was primarily due to a $1.9 million increase in preferred stock dividends, a $1.0 million increase in interest expense, and the $2.1 million gain on disposal of properties that occurred in 2015. These amounts were partially offset by the incremental NOI derived from 2016 retail property acquisitions.
Wheeler reported Funds From Operations (FFO) available to Common Stock shareholders and holders of OP Units for the three months ended December 31, 2016 of $(1.0) million, or $(0.01) per share of Common Stock and OP Unit, compared to $0.5 million, or $0.01 per share of Common Stock and OP Unit for the prior year period.
AFFO for the three months ended December 31, 2016 was $1.5 million, or $0.02 per share of Common Stock and OP Unit, compared to $1.9 million, or $0.03 per Common Stock share and OP Unit for the same period of the prior year. 
NOI from continuing operations increased by 31.6% to $8.2 million for the three months ended December 31, 2016, as compared to NOI from continuing operations of $6.2 million for the prior year period.
Adjusted Earnings Before Interest, Taxes, Depreciation and Amortization (“Adjusted EBITDA”) was $6.4 million for the three months ended December 31, 2016, as compared to $4.7 million of Adjusted EBITDA for the three months ended December 31, 2015.
During the three months ended December 31, 2016, the Company recorded $363 thousand in interest income on the notes receivable and $64 thousand in development fees, net, attributable to Sea Turtle Marketplace ("Sea Turtle Development").
2016 Year-to-Date Financial Review

For the year ended December 31, 2016, total revenue from continuing operations increased by approximately 59.9% to $44.2 million, compared with total revenue from continuing operations of $27.6 million for the same prior year period.
NOI from continuing operations increased by 64.9% to $30.2 million for the year ended December 31, 2016, as compared to NOI from continuing operations of $18.3 million for the year ended December 31, 2015.
Net loss attributable to Wheeler Common Stock shareholders for the year ended December 31, 2016 was $15.9 million, or $0.24 per basic and diluted share, compared to a net loss of $103.8 million, or $2.67 per basic and diluted share, for the year ended December 31, 2015. The decrease in net loss for the year ended December 31, 2016 was primarily due to the reduction of preferred stock dividends, the one-time $72.6 million deemed dividend related to beneficial conversion feature of preferred stock that occurred in the third quarter 2015, and the incremental NOI derived from the property acquisitions occurring subsequent to December 31, 2015. These amounts were partially offset by additional depreciation, amortization and interest expense.
Wheeler reported FFO available to Common Stock shareholders and holders of OP Units for the year ended December 31, 2016 of $3.4 million, or $0.05 per share of Common Stock and OP Unit, compared to $(8.1) million, or $(0.19) per share of Common Stock and OP Unit for the year ended December 31, 2015.
AFFO for the year ended December 31, 2016 was $8.7 million, or $0.12 per share of Common Stock and OP Unit, compared to $0.8 million, or $0.02 per share of Common Stock and OP Unit for the year ended December 31, 2015.
Adjusted EBITDA was $24.5 million for the year ended December 31, 2016, as compared to $14.3 million of Adjusted EBITDA for the year ended December 31, 2015.
During the year ended December 31, 2016, the Company recorded $657 thousand in interest income on the notes receivable, $234 thousand in development fees, and $184 thousand in commissions, net, on Sea Turtle Development.
Acquisition Activity

On April 12, 2016, the Company completed its acquisition of 14 retail shopping centers located in Georgia and South Carolina (collectively the “A-C Portfolio”) for an aggregate purchase price of $71.00 million, paid through a combination of cash, debt and the issuance of 888,889 OP Units in the Operating Partnership. Collectively, the A-C Portfolio properties total 605,358 square feet in leaseable space, and were 92% leased as of the acquisition date by 77 primarily retail tenants.  Each property is anchored by either a Bi-Lo, Harris Teeter or Piggly Wiggly grocery store.
On November 10, 2016, we completed our acquisition of Berkley Shopping Center, a 47,945 square foot shopping center located in Norfolk, Virginia ("Berkley") from a related party for a contract price of $4.18 million. Berkley was 100% leased as of the acquisition date and is anchored by a Farm Fresh grocery store. We acquired Berkley from a related party through a combination of cash and the issuance of 221,476 OP Units in the Operating Partnership.
On November 10, 2016, we completed our acquisition of Sangaree Plaza and Tri-County Plaza, a 66,948 and 67,577 square foot shopping centers, respectively located in Summerville, South Carolina and Royston, Georgia (collectively "Sangaree/Tri-County"), from a related party for a total contract price of $10.77 million. Sangaree/Tri-County was 95.2% leased as of the acquisition date and are anchored by Bi-Lo grocery store. We acquired Sangaree/Tri-County from a related party through a combination of cash and the issuance of 122,250 OP Units in the Operating Partnership.
On November 15, 2016, the Company completed its acquisition of Riverbridge Shopping Center ("Riverbridge"), a 91,188 square foot shopping center located in Carollton, Georgia for a contract price of $7.00 million.  Riverbridge was 98.5% leased as of the acquisition date and is anchored by Ingles. The Company acquired Riverbridge through a combination of cash and debt.
On December 7, 2016, the Company completed the acquisition of Laburnum Square, a 109,405 square foot shopping center located in Richmond, Virginia ("Laburnum") for a contract price of $10.50 million, paid through a combination of cash and debt. Laburnum was 96.9% leased as of the acquisition date and is anchored by Kroger.
On December 12, 2016, the Company completed the acquisition of Franklin Village, a 151,673 square foot shopping center located in Kittanning, Pennsylvania ("Franklin") for a contract price of $13.10 million, paid through a combination of cash and debt. Franklin was 98.0% leased as of the acquisition date and is anchored by Shop ‘n Save.
On December 16, 2016, the Company completed the acquisition of Village at Martinsville, a 297,950 square foot shopping center located in Martinsville, Virginia ("Martinsville") for a contract price of $23.53 million, paid through a combination of cash and debt. Martinsville was 97.0% leased as of the acquisition date and is anchored by Kroger.
On December 20, 2016, the Company completed the acquisition of New Market Crossing, a 116,976 square foot shopping center located in Mt. Airy, North Carolina ("New Market") for a contract price of $9.00 million, paid through a combination of cash and debt. New Market was 93% leased as of the acquisition date and is anchored by Lowes Food Store.
On December 21, 2016, the Company completed the acquisition of Rivergate Shopping Center, a 205,810 square foot shopping center located in Macon, Georgia ("Rivergate") for a contract price of $37.25 million, paid through a combination of cash and debt. Rivergate was 96.0% leased as of the acquisition date and is anchored by Publix.
Leasing Review

For the three months ended December 31, 2016, the Company executed twenty-nine renewals totaling 137,572 square feet at a weighted-average increase of $0.38 per square foot, representing an increase of 3.92% over prior rates.
For the year ended December 31, 2016, the Company executed sixty-nine renewals totaling 286,263 square feet at a weighted-average increase of $0.52 per square foot, representing an increase of 4.90% over prior rates.
For the three months ended December 31, 2016, Wheeler signed nine new leases totaling approximately 56,914 square feet with a weighted-average rate of $8.53 per square foot.
For the year ended December 31, 2016, Wheeler signed forty-seven new leases totaling approximately 148,328 square feet with a weighted-average rate of $12.00 per square foot.
Approximately 7.17% of Wheeler’s gross leasable area is subject to leases that expire during the year ending December 31, 2016. Based on recent market trends, the Company believes that tenants will renew these leases at amounts and terms comparable to existing lease agreements.
Same-store NOI year-over-over growth for the three months ended December 31, 2016, was (4.1%) on a GAAP basis and (5.2%) on a cash basis. The same-store pool comprises the 1.7 million square feet that the Company owned as of January 1, 2015. Same-store results were driven by a 25 basis point increase in rental income, 33.6% decrease in tenant reimbursements and other income, offset by an 18.8% decrease in property operating expenses.
Same-store NOI year-over-over growth for the year ended December 31, 2016, was 3.7% on a GAAP basis and 2.8% on a cash basis. Same-store results were driven by a 2.3% increase in rental income, a 5.3% decrease in property operating expenses, and offset by a 3.8% decrease in tenant reimbursements and other revenue.
Balance Sheet Summary

The Company’s cash and cash equivalents decreased to $4.9 million at December 31, 2016, compared to $10.5 million at December 31, 2015.
Wheeler’s net investment properties as of December 31, 2016 (including assets held for sale) were valued at $389.1 million, as compared to $240.0 million as of December 31, 2015.
The Company’s total debt was $315.0 million (including debt associated with assets held for sale) at December 31, 2016, compared to $191.3 million at December 31, 2015. Wheeler’s weighted-average interest rate and term of its debt (including debt associated with assets held for sale) was 4.34% and 7.23 years, respectively, at December 31, 2016, compared to 4.71% and 7.60 years, respectively, at December 31, 2015.
During the year, the Company entered into an $11.0 million note receivable for the partial funding of Sea Turtle Development and a $1.0 million note receivable in consideration for the sale of 10.39 acres of land owned by the Company. The notes are collateralized by a 2nd deed of trust on the property and accrue interest at 12% annually. The Company earns 8% cash interest, with 4% accruing until maturity of the loan.
One-for-Eight Reverse Stock Split

The Company's Board of Directors has approved a reverse stock split of Wheeler's outstanding shares of Common Stock at a ratio of one-for-eight.  The reverse stock split is scheduled to take effect at about 5:00 p.m. Eastern Time on March 31, 2017 (the “Effective Time”). At the Effective Time, every eight issued and outstanding shares of Common Stock of the Company will be converted into one share of Common Stock of the Company. In addition, at the Effective Time, the number of authorized shares of Common Stock will also be reduced on a one-for-eight basis. The par value of each share of Common Stock will remain unchanged. Trading in Wheeler's Common Stock on a split adjusted basis is expected to begin at the market open on April 3, 2017. Wheeler's Common Stock will continue trading on the NASDAQ under the symbol “WHLR” but will be assigned a new CUSIP number.
As a result of the reverse stock split, the number of outstanding shares of Wheeler’s Common Stock will be reduced from approximately 68,030,549 to approximately 8,503,819. Concurrently, the authorized number of shares of Common Stock will be reduced from 150,000,000 to 18,750,000.  No fractional shares will be issued in connection with the reverse stock split.  Instead, Computershare, Wheeler’s transfer agent will aggregate all fractional shares that otherwise would have been issued as a result of the reverse stock split and those shares will be sold into the market. Shareholders who would otherwise hold a fractional share of Wheeler’s Common Stock will receive a cash payment from the net proceeds of the sale in lieu of such fractional share. In addition, the reverse stock split will effect a reduction in the number of shares of Common Stock issuable upon the exercise or conversion, as applicable, of the Company’s warrants, Series B Convertible Preferred Stock (“Series B Preferred Stock”), Series D Preferred Stock and convertible debt outstanding immediately prior to the effectiveness of the reverse stock split, with corresponding increases in the exercise and conversion prices, as applicable, of such warrants, Series B Preferred Stock, Series D Preferred Stock and convertible debt. 
The reverse stock split will apply to all of Wheeler’s authorized and outstanding shares of Common Stock as of the Effective Time. Stockholders of record will be receiving information from Computershare, regarding their stock ownership following the reverse stock split and cash in lieu of fractional share payments, if applicable. Stockholders who hold their shares in brokerage accounts or “street name” are not required to take any action in connection with the reverse stock split. The reverse stock split will also apply to the Operating Partnership Units, and all outstanding and authorized Operating Partnership Units will be reduced on the same one-for-eight basis as the Common Stock.  No fractional Operating Partnership Units will be issued as a result of the reverse stock split and Operating Partnership Unit holders will receive cash in lieu for their fractional Operating Partnership Units, at the same rate as Common Stock holders receive for fractional shares of Common Stock.
Dividend Distribution

For the three months ended December 31, 2016, the Company declared approximately $3.9 million in dividend payments for Common Stock shareholders and holders of OP units.
For the three months ended December 31, 2016, the Company declared approximately $2.3 million in dividends to the Series A, Series B and Series D Preferred Stock shareholders.
For the year ended December 31, 2016, the Company declared approximately $15.3 million in dividend payments for Common Stock shareholders and holders of OP units.
For the year ended December 31, 2016, the Company declared approximately $4.3 million in dividends to the Series A, Series B and Series D Preferred Stock shareholders.
Dividend Payout Schedule Amended

Effective April 1, 2017 the Company’s Board of Directors has approved a change in the Company’s Common Stock dividend payment schedule such that future dividends will be paid quarterly commencing in July 2017 to shareholders of record on June 30, 2017. Giving effect to the reverse stock split, the distribution rate will be multiplied by 8, or $0.42 per share on a quarterly basis. Expected record and payment dates for the next four quarters are set out in the table below:
 	Record date	 	 	Payable date	 	 	Amount
 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 
 	June 30, 2017	 	 	July 15, 2017	 	 	$0.42
 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 
 	September 29, 2017	 	 	October 15, 2017	 	 	$0.42
 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 
 	December 29, 2017	 	 	January 15, 2018	 	 	$0.42
 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 
 	March 30, 2018	 	 	April 15, 2018	 	 	$0.42
 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 
2017 Outlook and Guidance
Management will discuss its outlook for 2017 and establish Full-Year and First Quarter Core FFO and AFFO per split-adjusted share guidance on the earnings call (February 28, 2017) at 10:00 AM ET.

Conference Call Dial-in and Webcast Information:
The dial-in numbers are:
Live Participant Dial-In (Toll-Free): 877-407-3101  
Live Participant Dial-In (International): 201-493-6789

The conference call will also be webcast. To listen to the call, please go to the Investor Relations section of Wheeler’s website at www.whlr.us, or click on the following link: http://whlr.equisolvewebcast.com/q4-2016.

Supplemental Information
Further details regarding Wheeler Real Estate Investment Trust, Inc.’s operations and financials for the year ended December 31, 2016, including a supplemental presentation, are available through the Company’s website by visiting www.whlr.us.

About Wheeler Real Estate Investment Trust, Inc.
Headquartered in Virginia Beach, VA, Wheeler Real Estate Investment Trust, Inc. is a fully-integrated, self-managed commercial real estate investment company focused on acquiring and managing income-producing retail properties with a primary focus on grocery-anchored centers. Wheeler’s portfolio contains well-located, potentially dominant retail properties in secondary and tertiary markets that generate attractive, risk-adjusted returns, with a particular emphasis on grocery-anchored retail centers. For additional information about the Company, please visit: www.whlr.us.

Financial Information
A copy of Wheeler’s Annual Report on Form 10-K, which includes the Company’s consolidated financial statements and management’s discussion & analysis of financial condition and results of operations, will be available upon filing via the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission website (www.sec.gov) or through Wheeler’s website at www.whlr.us.

FFO, AFFO, Pro Forma AFFO, Property NOI, EBITDA and Adjusted EBITDA are non-GAAP financial measures within the meaning of the rules of the Securities and Exchange Commission. Wheeler considers FFO, AFFO, Pro Forma AFFO, Property NOI, EBITDA and Adjusted EBITDA to be important supplemental measures of its operating performance and believes it is frequently used by securities analysts, investors and other interested parties in the evaluation of REITs, many of which present FFO when reporting their results. FFO is intended to exclude GAAP historical cost depreciation and amortization of real estate and related assets, which assumes that the value of real estate assets diminishes ratably over time. Historically, however, real estate values have risen or fallen with market conditions. Because FFO excludes depreciation and amortization unique to real estate and gains and losses from property dispositions, the Company believes that it provides a performance measure that, when compared year-over-year, reflects the impact to operations from trends in occupancy rates, rental rates, operating costs, development activities and interest costs, providing perspective not immediately apparent from the closest GAAP measurement, net income.

Management believes that the computation of FFO in accordance with NAREIT’s definition includes certain items that are not indicative of the operating performance of the Company’s real estate assets. These items include, but are not limited to, non-recurring expenses, legal settlements, legal and professional fees, and acquisition costs. Management uses AFFO, which is a non-GAAP financial measure, to exclude such items. Management believes that reporting AFFO and Pro Forma AFFO in addition to FFO is a useful supplemental measure for the investment community to use when evaluating the operating performance of the Company on a comparative basis. Management also believes that Property NOI, EBITDA and Adjusted EBITDA represent important supplemental measures for securities analysts, investors and other interested parties, as they are often used in calculating net asset value, leverage and other financial metrics used by these parties in the evaluation of REITs.

Forward-Looking Statement
This press release may contain “forward-looking” statements as defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. When the Company uses words such as “may,” “will,” “intend,” “should,” “believe,” “expect,” “anticipate,” “project,” “estimate” or similar expressions that do not relate solely to historical matters, it is making forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve risks and uncertainties that may cause the actual results to differ materially from the Company’s expectations discussed in the forward-looking statements. The Company’s expected results may not be achieved, and actual results may differ materially from expectations. Specifically, the Company’s statements regarding: (i) the future generation of financial returns from the acquisition of ‘necessity based’ retail focused properties; (ii) the Company’s ability to complete future
acquisitions of properties; (iii) the Company's expectation to maintain and/or increase its historical occupancy rates; (iv) the Company’s expectation that tenants will renew leases at amounts and terms comparable to existing lease agreements; (v) the Company's ability to maintain and/or increase rent spreads; (vi) the Company's anticipated ability to effectuate the reverse stock split; (vii) the anticipated implementation of the Company’s acquisition strategy; and (viii) the anticipated ability to produce returns and growth for the Company and its shareholders are forward-looking statements. These statements are not guarantees of future performance and are subject to risks, uncertainties and other factors, some of which are beyond our control, are difficult to predict and could cause actual results to differ materially from those expressed or forecasted in the forward-looking statements. In addition, this press release states that the Company’s quarterly dividend rate on the Company’s common stock is $0.42 per share.  A possible implication of this statement is that the Company will continuously pay quarterly dividends on the Company’s common stock of $0.42 per share, or $1.68 per share per year in the future.  The Company’s dividend rates are set and may be reset from time to time by its Board of Directors.  The Company’s Board of Directors will consider many factors when setting dividend rates, including the Company’s historical and projected income, normalized funds from operations, the then current and expected needs and availability of cash to pay the Company’s obligations, distributions which may be required to be paid to maintain the Company’s tax status as a real estate investment trust and other factors deemed relevant by the Board of Directors in its discretion.  Accordingly, future dividend rates may be increased or decreased and there is no assurance as to the rate at which future dividends will be paid.  For these reasons, among others, investors are cautioned not to place undue reliance upon any forward-looking statements in this press release.

Additional factors are discussed in the Company's filings with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission, which are available for review at www.sec.gov. The Company undertakes no obligation to publicly revise these forward-looking statements to reflect events or circumstances that arise after the date hereof.

@@@@

BAR HARBOR, Maine--(BUSINESS WIRE)--

Bar Harbor Bankshares (NYSE MKT: BHB) (the “Company”) the parent company of Bar Harbor Bank & Trust, today announced that its Board of Directors declared a three-for-two split of its common stock payable in the form of a large stock dividend. The three-for-two stock split as a large stock dividend is payable March 21, 2017, to its common stockholders of record at the close of business on March 7, 2017. The additional shares will be distributed by the Company’s transfer agent, American Stock Transfer & Trust Company, and the per share price of the Company’s common stock will adjust accordingly on the NYSE MKT, LLC. Stockholders will receive cash in lieu of any fractional share of common stock that they otherwise would have been entitled to receive in connection with the split, except that those shareholders participating in the Company’s dividend reinvestment and share purchase plan will have fractional shares credited to their accounts.

The Company currently has approximately 10,257,918 shares of common stock outstanding. After the stock split as a large stock dividend, the number of shares of common stock outstanding will increase to approximately 15,386,877.

“Bar Harbor Bankshares has generated increased value for shareholders through execution of our business strategies, stock price appreciation and quarterly cash dividends,” said Company President and Chief Executive Officer, Curtis C. Simard. “We have now closed the Lake Sunapee Bank Group acquisition and believe that the three-for-two stock split will make our company more attractive to a broader range of investors.”

Bar Harbor Bankshares (NYSE MKT: BHB) is the parent of Bar Harbor Bank & Trust. Founded in 1887, Bar Harbor Bank & Trust is a true community bank serving the financial needs of its clients for over 125 years. Bar Harbor provides a full range of financial services through its 49 branch locations in all three Northern New England states of Maine, New Hampshire and Vermont. Bar Harbor offers easy-to-understand deposit and loan products for families, businesses, and non-profit organizations. For more information, visit www.bhbt.com.

This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements include, but are not limited to, expectations or predictions of future financial or business performance, conditions relating to Bar Harbor. Forward- looking statements are typically identified by words such as “believe,” “expect,” “anticipate,” “intend,” “target,” “estimate,” “continue,” “positions,” “prospects or “potential,” by future conditional verbs such as “will,” “would,” “should,” “could” or “may,” or by variations of such words or by similar expressions. These forward-looking statements are subject to numerous assumptions, risks and uncertainties, which change over time. Forward looking statements are made only as of the date of this press release, and Bar Harbor undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statements contained in this press release to reflect events or conditions after the date hereof. Actual results may differ materially from those described in any such forward-looking statements.

In addition to factors previously disclosed in the reports filed by Bar Harbor and Lake Sunapee with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission (the “SEC”) and those identified elsewhere in this document, the following factors, among others, could cause actual results to differ materially from forward looking statements or historical performance: difficulties and delays in integrating the business or fully realizing cost savings and other benefits; changes in asset quality and credit risk; the inability to sustain revenue and earnings growth; changes in interest rates and capital markets; inflation; customer acceptance of products and services; customer borrowing, repayment, investment and deposit practices; competitive conditions; economic conditions, including downturns in the local, regional or national economies; the impact, extent and timing of technological changes; changes in accounting policies or practices; changes in laws and regulations; and other actions of the Federal Reserve Board and other legislative and regulatory actions and reforms.


View source version on businesswire.com: http://www.businesswire.com/news/home/20170221006529/en/

@@@@

SANTA ROSA, Calif., Feb. 09, 2017 (GLOBE NEWSWIRE) -- Summit State Bank (SSBI) today reported a five-for-four stock split declared for common shareholders. The record date for the stock split is February 28, 2017 and shares will be issued on or about March 14, 2017. Summit State Bank currently has 4,815,880 shares of common stock outstanding and will have approximately 6,019,000 shares after the new shares are issued.

“The Directors are pleased to reward our shareholders with the declaration of the five-for-four stock split,” said Allan Hemphill, Chairman of the Board of Directors.

About Summit State Bank

Summit State Bank, a local community bank, has total assets of $514 million and total equity of $59 million at December 31, 2016. Headquartered in Sonoma County, the Bank specializes in providing exceptional customer service and customized financial solutions to aid in the success of local small businesses and nonprofits throughout Sonoma County. 

Summit State Bank’s workforce resembles the diverse community it serves.  Presently, 80% of management are women and minorities with 40% represented on the Executive Management Team. Through the inclusion and engagement of its workforce, Summit State Bank has earned many prestigious awards including: Best Company to do Business with in Sonoma County; Best Places to Work in the North Bay; Super Performing Bank; and Top 75 Corporate Philanthropists in the San Francisco Bay. Summit State Bank’s stock is traded on the Nasdaq Global Market under the symbol SSBI. Further information can be found at www.summitstatebank.com.

Forward-looking Statements

Except for historical information contained herein, the statements contained in this news release, are forward-looking statements within the meaning of the “safe harbor” provisions of Section 27A of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and Section 21E of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.  This release may contain forward-looking statements that are subject to risks and uncertainties. Such risks and uncertainties may include but are not necessarily limited to fluctuations in interest rates, inflation, government regulations and general economic conditions, and competition within the business areas in which the Bank will be conducting its operations, including the real estate market in California and other factors beyond the Bank’s control.  Such risks and uncertainties could cause results for subsequent interim periods or for the entire year to differ materially from those indicated.  You should not place undue reliance on the forward-looking statements, which reflect management’s view only as of the date hereof.  The Bank undertakes no obligation to publicly revise these forward-looking statements to reflect subsequent events or circumstances.

@@@@

Company Effects a 1 for 1.5 Reverse Stock Split of the Common Stock

Company’s Stock Expected to Commence Trading on NASDAQ on March 10, 2017

MINNEAPOLIS, March 10, 2017 (GLOBE NEWSWIRE) --  Cachet Financial Solutions, Inc. (CAFN), a leading mobile FinTech provider of cloud-based remote deposit capture (RDC) and mobile prepaid card solutions, has announced today the pricing of its public offering of 2,333,334 shares of common stock at a public offering price of $4.50 per share.

The Company also announced a reverse stock split of its common stock in a ratio of 1 for 1.5 that was effective as of March 9, 2017. In addition, the Company announced that its common stock was approved for listing on the NASDAQ Capital Market, and trading on the NASDAQ Capital Market is expected to commence on March 10, 2017. The Company’s shares of common stock will continue to trade under the ticker symbol “CAFN.”

The Company has granted the underwriters a 45-day option to purchase up to an additional 350,000 shares of common stock at the public offering price to cover over-allotments, if any. All shares of the common stock in this offering are being sold by the Company. This offering is expected to close on March 15, 2017, subject to customary closing conditions.

Lake Street Capital Markets, LLC and National Securities Corporation, a wholly owned subsidiary of National Holdings, Inc. (NHLD), are acting as joint book-running managers for the offering.

A registration statement relating to the securities being sold in this offering was declared effective by the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission on March 10, 2017. This offering is being made only by means of a prospectus. When available, copies of the final prospectus relating to this offering may be obtained by request to the offices of Lake Street Capital Markets, LLC, Attn: Equity Syndicate Department, 225 South 6th St, Ste 4750, Minneapolis, MN 55402, Telephone: (888) 330-4648, Email: Contact@lakestreetcm.com; or the offices of National Securities Corporation, Attn: Marguerite Rogers, Associate Vice President, Syndicate, 410 Park Avenue, 14th Floor, New York, NY 10022, Telephone (212) 417-8227, Email: mrodgers@nhldcorp.com; or the on the SEC's website at http://www.sec.gov.

This press release shall not constitute an offer to sell or the solicitation of an offer to buy, nor shall there be any sale of, these securities in any state or jurisdiction in which such offer, solicitation or sale would be unlawful prior to the registration or qualification under the securities laws of any such state or jurisdiction.

About Cachet Financial Solutions, Inc.
Cachet Financial Solutions is a leading cloud-based, SaaS technology provider serving the financial services industry with mobile money and remote deposit capture solutions for PC, Mac and mobile. Founded in early 2010, Cachet has quickly grown into a technology leader and trusted partner of some of the world’s largest and most respected financial organizations. With remarkable growth, an impressive client base and award-winning technologies, Cachet continues to drive innovation and deliver world-class solutions to financial institutions of all sizes.

The company's industry-leading solutions help clients to increase customer engagement, grow revenues and gain competitive advantage. Cachet's cloud-based technology platform simplifies development, deployment and servicing of consumer and commercial solutions—minimizing cost and accelerating speed-to-market and ROI. Enabled by Cachet's complete suite of business and consumer solutions, financial institutions can better serve the needs of all their customers. For more information, visit www.cachetfinancial.com.

@@@@

NOVATO, Calif., Jan. 26, 2017 /PRNewswire/ -- Hennessy Advisors, Inc. (HNNA) reported today that its Board of Directors has approved a 3-for-2 stock split and a quarterly dividend of $0.075 per share, which represents a 12.5% increase over the previous quarterly dividend on a split-adjusted basis. The stock split will occur and the dividend will be paid on March 6, 2017, to shareholders of record as of February 10, 2017.

"We are proud to be able to reward our shareholders by splitting our stock 3-for-2 and increasing our cash dividend," said Neil Hennessy, President, Chairman and CEO of Hennessy Advisors, Inc.  "This decision demonstrates our continued confidence in the Company's future.  We remain committed to executing our long-term business plan, searching for strategic acquisitions and growing organically through our sales and marketing programs," added Mr. Hennessy.

About Hennessy Advisors, Inc.
Hennessy Advisors, Inc. is a publicly traded investment manager offering a broad range of domestic equity, balanced and fixed income, and sector and specialty mutual funds. Hennessy Advisors, Inc. is committed to its consistent and repeatable investment process, combining time-tested stock selection strategies with a highly disciplined, team-managed approach, and to superior service to shareholders.

Supplemental Information
Nothing in this press release shall be considered a solicitation to buy or an offer to sell a security to any person in any jurisdiction where such offer, solicitation, purchase or sale would be unlawful under the securities laws of such jurisdiction.

Available Topic Expert(s): For information on the listed expert(s), click appropriate link.
Neil J. Hennessy
ProfNet - https://profnet.prnewswire.com/Subscriber/ExpertProfile.aspx?ei=100270

 

To view the original version on PR Newswire, visit:http://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/hennessy-advisors-inc-announces-3-for-2-stock-split-and-quarterly-dividend-increase-of-125-300397930.html

@@@@

ROANOKE, Va., Jan. 17, 2017 (GLOBE NEWSWIRE) -- RGC Resources, Inc. (RGCO) today announced that its Board of Directors has approved a three-for-two stock split of the Company’s outstanding common stock.  The stock split will be effected in the form of a stock dividend entitling each shareholder as of the record date to receive one additional share of common stock for every two shares of common stock owned.  The stock dividend will be issued on March 1, 2017 to all shareholders of record at the close of business on February 15, 2017.

“The stock split highlights the exceptional value RGC Resources has delivered to shareholders over the long-term as well as the short-term.  Our team continues to execute our strategies of investing in our regulated utility and other growth opportunities, which have led to profitable earnings growth, superior dividend growth and increased shareholder value.  We are excited about our prospects for continued growth,” said John S. D’Orazio, President and Chief Executive Officer of RGC Resources, Inc.  “The decision to split the stock will also make the shares more affordable to current and potential investors and should lead to an increase in the trading volume of our stock.”

RGC Resources last stock split was in 2011 when a two-for-one stock split occurred.

RGC Resources, Inc. provides energy and related products and services to customers in Virginia through its operating subsidiaries Roanoke Gas Company and RGC Midstream, LLC.

From time to time, the Company may publish forward-looking statements relating to such matters as anticipated financial performance, business prospects, technological developments, new products, research and development activities and similar matters.  The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 provides a safe harbor for forward-looking statements.  In order to comply with the terms of the safe harbor, the Company notes that a variety of factors could cause the Company’s actual results and experience to differ materially from the anticipated results or other expectations expressed in the Company’s forward-looking statements.  Past performance is not necessarily a predictor of future results.

@@@@

NEW YORK, Feb. 28, 2017 /PRNewswire/ -- Global Net Lease, Inc. ("GNL") (GNL) announced today that its previously announced 1-for-3 reverse stock split of common stock and outstanding units became effective today at 5:00 p.m. EST (the "Effective Time"). GNL's common stock will continue to trade on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol "GNL" under its new CUSIP number: 379378 201.

At the Effective Time, every three issued and outstanding shares of common stock were converted into one share of common stock and every three operating partnership units were converted into one operating partnership unit. As a result of the reverse stock split, the number of outstanding shares of GNL's common stock was reduced from approximately 199.0 million to approximately 66.3 million. 

As previously announced, the split will not affect the timing of the payment of GNL's March dividend, which will continue to be paid on March 15, 2017, to stockholders of record at the close of business on March 8, 2017. Stockholders of record will receive the same March dividend payment but adjusted to reflect the reverse stock split equal to $0.1775 per share.

No fractional shares or operating partnership units were issued in connection with the reverse stock split. Instead, cash will be paid in lieu of any fractional share that would have otherwise resulted from the reverse stock split. No payments were made in respect of any fractional operating partnership units. The reverse share split applied to all of GNL's outstanding common shares of common stock and therefore did not affect any stockholder's relative ownership percentage. Stockholders will receive information from GNL's transfer agent regarding their stockholdings following the reverse stock split as well as any cash in lieu payments that may result from the reverse stock split. Stockholders were not required to take any action to effectuate the exchange of their stock.

About Global Net Lease, Inc.
Global Net Lease, Inc. (GNL) is a publicly traded real estate investment trust listed on the NYSE focused on acquiring a diversified global portfolio of commercial properties, with an emphasis on sale-leaseback transactions involving single tenant, mission critical income producing net-leased assets across the United States, Western and Northern Europe. Additional information about GNL can be found on its website at www.globalnetlease.com.

Important Notice
The statements in this press release that are not historical facts may be forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements involve risks and uncertainties that could cause the outcome to be materially different. In addition, words such as "may," "will," "seeks," "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "plans," "intends," "should" or similar expressions indicate a forward-looking statement, although not all forward-looking statements include these words. Actual results may differ materially from those contemplated by such forward-looking statements, including those set forth in the Risk Factors section of GNL's most recent Annual Report on Form 10-K, and in future filings with the SEC. Further, forward-looking statements speak only as of the date they are made, and GNL undertakes no obligation to update or revise forward-looking statements to reflect changed assumptions, the occurrence of unanticipated events or changes to future operating results over time, unless required by law.

To view the original version on PR Newswire, visit:http://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/global-net-lease-inc-announces-completion-of-1-for-3-reverse-stock-split-300415295.html

@@@@

Oakland, Calif. - Feb. 28, 2017 - DASAN Zhone Solutions, Inc. (DZSI), a global leader in fiber access transformation for enterprise and service provider networks, today announced that the previously announced reverse stock split of the company`s common stock became effective on February 28, 2017 at a ratio of one-for-five, and that the company`s common stock will commence trading on a post-split basis beginning on March 1, 2017.  The company received the requisite stockholder approval for the reverse stock split on February 27, 2017.  The new CUSIP number for the company`s common stock will be 23305L206.

               The reverse stock split automatically combined every five shares of the company`s common stock into one issued and outstanding share without any change in the par value of the shares.  Following the reverse stock split, the number of outstanding shares of the company`s common stock was proportionally reduced from approximately 81.9 million to approximately 16.4 million.  The reverse stock split also proportionately decreased the number of authorized shares of the company`s common stock from 180 million to 36 million. 

               No fractional shares of common stock will be issued in connection with the reverse stock split.  Shareholders that would otherwise hold a fractional share of the company`s common stock will receive a cash payment in lieu of fractional shares.  The company`s common stock will continue to trade on a post-split basis under the trading symbol "DZSI."
  
              As previously announced, DASAN Zhone Solutions is required to evidence compliance with Nasdaq`s initial listing minimum bid or closing price requirement by March 13, 2017.  Although DASAN Zhone Solutions expects that the reverse stock split will enable the company to comply with the Nasdaq initial listing and minimum bid price requirement, there can be no assurance that the company will be able to regain such compliance. Delisting from the Nasdaq Capital Market could have a material adverse effect on the company`s business and on the trading of its common stock.

About DASAN Zhone Solutions

               DASAN Zhone Solutions, Inc. is a global leader in broad-based network access solutions. The company provides solutions in five major product areas including broadband access, Ethernet switching, mobile backhaul, passive optical LAN (POL) and software defined networks (SDN).  More than 750 of the world`s most innovative network operators, service providers and enterprises turn to DASAN Zhone Solutions for fiber access transformation.  DASAN Zhone Solutions is committed to building the fastest and highest quality All IP Multi-Service solution for its customers.  DASAN Zhone Solutions is headquartered in Oakland, California.

Forward-Looking Statements
   
             This press release contains forward-looking statements that are subject to the safe harbors created under the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. Words such as "anticipate," "believe," "continue," "could," "estimate," "expect," "goal," "intend," "may," "plan," "project," "seek," "should," "target," "will," "would," variations of such words, and similar expressions are intended to identify forward-looking statements. In addition, forward-looking statements include, among others, statements that refer to the expected commencement of trading of the company`s post-split common stock[, compliance with the Nasdaq initial listing minimum bid or closing price requirements and the consequences of delisting of the company`s common stock from the Nasdaq Capital Market]. Readers are cautioned that actual results could differ materially from those expressed in or contemplated by the forward-looking statements. Please refer to the risk factors contained in the company`s SEC filings available at www.sec.gov, including without limitation, the company`s most recent reports on Forms 10-K, 10-Q and 8-K. Readers are cautioned not to place undue reliance on any forward-looking statements, which speak only as of the date on which they are made. The company undertakes no obligation to update or revise any forward-looking statements for any reason.

@@@@

NEW YORK, Feb. 17, 2017 /PRNewswire/ -- Pareteum Corporation (NYSE MKT: TEUM)("Pareteum" or the "Company"), a leading international provider of mobile networking software and services, today announced that its Board of Directors (the "Board") has approved a 1-for-25 reverse stock split of its issued and outstanding shares of common stock as the next step in the Company's restructuring plan. The 1-for-25 reverse stock split will be effective upon the filing and effectiveness of a Certificate of Amendment to the Company's Certificate of Incorporation after the market closes on February 24, 2017. Pareteum's common stock will begin trading on a split adjusted basis when the market opens on February 27, 2017.

At Pareteum's 2016 Annual Meeting of Stockholders held on August 16, 2016, Pareteum's stockholders granted authority to the Company's Board, at its discretion, to determine whether to effectuate a reverse stock split of the Company's common stock at a ratio of up to one-for-twenty five and at a time and date, to be determined.

"Over the past year, Pareteum has successfully undergone a comprehensive restructuring during which we focused on rationalizing our operational structure, solidifying our financial foundation and significantly enhancing our product and services capabilities in support of our dedicated clients and partners. Through the combination of these efforts and four recently awarded contracts, we have confidence in our ability to demonstrate growth in 2017 as well as achieving neutral pro-forma EBITDA, as we reported in the third quarter. Now, with shareholder and Board approval, we can undertake this next step in our ongoing restructuring through this reverse stock split," said Hal Turner, Executive Chairman of Pareteum. "Looking ahead, we believe the successful completion of the reverse stock split will provide the Company with a number of immediate benefits including ensuring compliance with NYSE MKT minimum bid listing requirements and enhancing the suitability of the Company's shares for potential long-term institutional and individual investors, as well as analysts. On behalf of the entire expanded management team, and as shareholders ourselves, we wish to thank all of our stakeholders for their continued support. We are confident in the progress we have made to transform this company which lays the foundation for accelerated growth, and affirms our commitment to building greater shareholder value in the coming months," Mr. Turner added.

Pareteum's shares of common stock will continue to trade on the NYSE MKT under the symbol "TEUM." The new CUSIP number for the Company's common stock post reverse stock split is 69946T 207.

"With this reverse split, we are addressing the NYSE MKT's listing requirements, but more importantly, we believe that this will demonstrate to the market, potential customers and employees, that we have substantially completed our restructuring program and have built a business that can support long-term growth on a stable, solid foundation," said Victor Bozzo, CEO of Pareteum. "We believe that the goals of our sales organization are now clearer than ever; capitalize on the business' stability and momentum and leverage the enhanced capabilities of our global mobility cloud platform which now also supports Internet of Things and advanced messaging, while we continue to convert our growing pipeline into sales."

Upon the effectiveness of the reverse stock split, every 25 shares of Pareteum's issued and outstanding common stock (and such shares held in treasury) will automatically be converted into one share of common stock. No fractional shares will be issued if, as a result of the reverse stock split, a stockholder would otherwise become entitled to a fractional share. Instead, each stockholder will be entitled to receive a cash payment equal to the fair value of the fractional share to which such holder would otherwise be entitled, which fair value will be based upon the volume weighted average price for the five (5) days preceding the reverse stock split. Continental Stock Transfer & Trust Company, LLC, Pareteum's transfer agent, will act as the exchange agent for the reverse stock split. Please contact Continental Stock Transfer & Trust Company, LLC for further information at (212) 509-4000.

About Pareteum Corporation:
Pareteum Corporation and its subsidiaries provide a complete mobility cloud platform, utilizing messaging and security capabilities for the global Mobile, MVNO, Enterprise and IoT markets. Mobile Network Operator (MNO) customers include Vodafone, the world's second largest mobile operator by customer count, Zain, the 4th largest mobile operator in the world in terms of geographical presence and other Tier 1 operators, MVNO customers such as Lebara and Lowi, and partners including Cleartech and Expeto. For more information please visit: www.pareteum.com.

Forward-Looking Statements:
Certain statements contained herein constitute "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Such statements may include, without limitation, statements with respect to Pareteum's plans and objectives, projections, expectations and intentions. These forward-looking statements are based on current expectations, estimates and projections about Pareteum's industry, management's beliefs and certain assumptions made by management. Readers are cautioned that any such forward-looking statements are not guarantees of future performance and are subject to certain risks, uncertainties and assumptions that are difficult to predict. Because such statements involve risks and uncertainties, the actual results and performance of Pareteum may differ materially from the results expressed or implied by such forward-looking statements. Given these uncertainties, readers are cautioned not to place undue reliance on such forward-looking statements. Unless otherwise required by law, Pareteum also disclaims any obligation to update its view of any such risks or uncertainties or to announce publicly the result of any revisions to the forward-looking statements made here. Additional information concerning certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those projected or suggested in Pareteum's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, copies of which are available from the SEC or may be obtained upon request from Pareteum Corporation.

@@@@

WEST PALM BEACH, FL--(Marketwired - February 07, 2017) - Rennova Health, Inc. (RNVA) (RNVAZ) today announced that effective at 5:00 pm, Eastern Time, on February 22, 2017 (the "Effective Time"), the Company will effect a 1 for 30 reverse stock split of its outstanding common stock. The Company's common stock will open for trading on The NASDAQ Capital Market on February 23, 2017 on a post-split basis.

The reverse stock split is intended to increase the per share trading price of the Company's common stock to satisfy the $1.00 minimum bid price requirement for continued listing on The NASDAQ Capital Market. As a result of the reverse stock split, every 30 shares of the Company's common stock issued and outstanding on the Effective Time will be consolidated into one issued and outstanding share, except to the extent that the reverse stock split results in any of the Company's stockholders owning a fractional share, which would be rounded up to the next highest whole share. In connection with the reverse stock split, there will be no change in the nominal par value per share of $0.01.

Trading of the Company's common stock on The NASDAQ Capital Market will continue, on a split-adjusted basis, with the opening of the markets on Thursday, February 23, 2017, under the existing trading symbol "RNVA" under a new CUSIP number. Based on the number of shares currently outstanding, the reverse stock split will reduce the number of shares of the Company's common stock outstanding from approximately 152.0 million pre-reverse split shares to approximately 5.1 million post-reverse split.

All outstanding preferred shares, stock options, warrants, and equity incentive plans immediately prior to the reverse stock split will be appropriately adjusted by dividing the number of shares of common stock into which the preferred shares, stock options, warrants and equity incentive plans are exercisable or convertible by 30 and multiplying the exercise or conversion price by 30, as a result of the reverse stock split.

The Company has retained its transfer agent, Computershare, Inc., to act as its exchange agent for the reverse stock split. Computershare will provide stockholders of record as of the Effective Time a letter of transmittal providing instructions for the exchange of their stock certificates. Stockholders owning shares via a broker or other nominee will have their positions automatically adjusted to reflect the reverse stock split, subject to brokers' particular processes, and will not be required to take any action in connection with the reverse stock split.

The reverse stock split was approved by the directors of the Company on February 7, 2017, pursuant to a resolution adopted by the stockholders of the Company at the annual meeting of stockholders held on December 22, 2016.

About Rennova Health, Inc.

Rennova provides industry-leading diagnostics and supportive software solutions to healthcare providers, delivering an efficient, effective patient experience and superior clinical outcomes. Through an ever-expanding group of strategic brands that work in unison to empower customers, we are creating the next generation of healthcare. For more information, please visit www.rennovahealth.com.

Forward-Looking Statements

This press release includes "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the safe harbor provisions of the United States Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Actual results may differ from expectations and, consequently, you should not rely on these forward-looking statements as predictions of future events. Words such as "expect," "estimate," "project," "budget," "forecast," "anticipate," "intend," "plan," "may," "will," "could," "should," "believes," "predicts," "potential," "continue," and similar expressions are intended to identify such forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements involve significant risks and uncertainties that could cause the actual results to differ materially from the expected results. Additional information concerning these and other risk factors are contained in the Company's most recent filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The Company cautions readers not to place undue reliance upon any forward-looking statements, which speak only as of the date made. The Company does not undertake or accept any obligation or undertaking to release publicly any updates or revisions to any forward-looking statements to reflect any change in their expectations or any change in events, conditions or circumstances on which any such statement is based, except as required by law.

@@@@

OAKDALE, Minn., Feb. 10, 2017 /PRNewswire/ -- Imation Corp. (IMN) (the "Company") today announced that it will change its name to "GlassBridge Enterprises, Inc."  The name change follows the launch of the Company's investment adviser subsidiary, GlassBridge Asset Management, LLC, and the successful conclusion of the transition of the Company's principal business activities to become a publicly-traded alternative asset manager.

The name change will be accomplished through a short-form merger pursuant to Section 253 of the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware. A subsidiary formed solely for the purpose of the name change will be merged with and into the Company, with the Company remaining as the surviving corporation in the merger. The merger will have the effect of amending the Company's Restated Certificate of Incorporation for the sole purpose of reflecting the Company's new legal name.

The Company's Board of Directors also approved a 1:10 reverse stock split of the Company's common stock following the approval by the Company's stockholders of a reverse stock split at the special stockholder meeting held on January 31, 2017. Every ten shares of common stock of the Company will automatically be combined into one share of common stock and the number of authorized shares of the Company's common stock will be reduced from 100,000,000 to 10,000,000.

The name change and the reverse stock split will both be effective following the close of trading on the NYSE on Tuesday, February 21, 2017.  The Company has applied to the NYSE to change its ticker symbol from "IMN" to "GLA", to take effect following the effectiveness of the name change and the reverse stock split.  The Company's common stock will then trade under a new CUSIP number, 377185 103.

About Imation/GlassBridge
Imation Corp. (IMN) is a holding company. The Company is actively exploring a diverse range of new, strategic asset management business opportunities for its portfolio. The Company's wholly-owned subsidiary, GlassBridge Asset Management, LLC ("GlassBridge"), is an investment advisor focused on technology-driven and quantitative strategies. The Company's partially-owned subsidiary, Nexsan Corporation, is a global enterprise data storage business.

About the Reverse Stock Split
No fractional shares of common stock will be issued in connection with the reverse stock split. If, as a result of the reverse stock split, a stockholder would otherwise hold a fractional share, by completing and executing a letter of transmittal and, where shares are held in certificated form, surrendering the stock certificate representing the stockholder's old shares of the Corporation, a stockholder will be entitled to receive a cash payment in lieu of the issuance of any such fractional share in an amount per share equal to the closing price per share on the NYSE on the trading day immediately preceding the effective time of the reverse stock split (as adjusted to give effect to the reverse stock split), without interest. The Company's transfer agent is Wells Fargo Bank, N.A. For questions relating to the reverse stock split, stockholders may contact Wells Fargo Shareowner Services by phone at (800) 468-9716. If shares are held by a bank, broker or other nominee, stockholders should contact that institution directly.

Forward Looking Statements
This press release may include "forward looking statements" within the meaning of the "safe harbor" provisions of the United Stated Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Forward-looking statements are not historical facts, and involve risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expected and projected. Words such as "expects", "believes", "anticipates", "intends", "estimates", "seeks" and variations and similar words and expressions are intended to identify such forward-looking statements. Such forward-looking statements with respect to the name change and reverse stock split are based on current expectations that are subject to risks and uncertainties. A number of factors could cause actual events, performance or results to differ materially from the events, performance and results discussed in the forward-looking statements. These factors include, but are not limited to such risks and uncertainties indicated from time to time in filings with the SEC by the Company. Readers are cautioned not to place undue reliance upon any forward-looking statements, which speak only as of the date made, and the Company undertakes no obligation to update or revise any forward-looking statements whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise, except as required by law.

Disclaimers
This press release does not constitute an offer to sell or a solicitation to buy any securities in any private investment vehicle managed by GlassBridge (collectively, the "GlassBridge-Managed Funds"), and may not be relied upon in connection with any offer or sale of securities. Any such offer or solicitation may only be made pursuant to the current Confidential Private Offering Memorandum (or similar document) for any such GlassBridge-Managed Fund, which are provided only to qualified offerees and which should be carefully reviewed prior to investing. GlassBridge is a newly formed entity and the GlassBridge funds are currently in formation state. GlassBridge is not currently registered with the SEC as an investment adviser under the U.S. Investment Advisers Act of 1940, as amended, or under similar state laws, and nothing in this press release constitutes investment advice with respect to securities.

Trademarks and Tradenames
This press release includes trademarks and tradenames owned by the Company and its subsidiaries, including "GlassBridge", "Imation" and "Nexsan". Solely for convenience, these trademarks or tradenames appear without the ® or ™ symbols, but such references are not intended to indicate in any way that the Company will not assert, to the fullest extent, our rights to use these trademarks and tradenames.

@@@@

PHILADELPHIA--(BUSINESS WIRE)--

Comcast Corporation (CMCSA) announced today that it increased its dividend by 15% to $1.26 per share on an annualized, pre-split basis, or $0.63 per share on an annualized, post-split basis. In accordance with the increase, the Board of Directors declared a quarterly cash dividend of $0.1575 a share, on a post-split basis, on the company’s common stock, payable on April 26, 2017 to shareholders of record as of the close of business on April 5, 2017.

In addition, Comcast announced that its Board of Directors has increased its stock repurchase program authorization to $12.0 billion. Comcast expects to repurchase $5.0 billion of its common stock during 2017, subject to market conditions.

Comcast also announced that its Board of Directors declared a two-for-one stock split in the form of a 100% stock dividend payable on February 17, 2017 to shareholders of record as of the close of business on February 8, 2017. The stock dividend will be an additional one share for every share held and will be payable in shares of Class A common stock (CMCSA) on the existing CMCSA shares and Class B common shares. Comcast expects its CMCSA shares to begin trading ex-dividend on February 21, 2017.

As of December 31, 2016, Comcast had outstanding approximately 2.366 billion shares of CMCSA and 9 million shares of Class B Common Stock. Upon completion of the split, the outstanding shares of CMCSA will increase to approximately 4.742 billion.

To automatically receive Comcast financial news by e-mail, please visit www.cmcsa.com and subscribe to E-mail Alerts.

About Comcast Corporation

Comcast Corporation (CMCSA) is a global media and technology company with two primary businesses, Comcast Cable and NBCUniversal. Comcast Cable is one of the nation's largest video, high-speed Internet and phone providers to residential customers under the XFINITY brand and also provides these services to businesses. NBCUniversal operates news, entertainment and sports cable networks, the NBC and Telemundo broadcast networks, television production operations, television station groups, Universal Pictures and Universal Parks and Resorts. Visit www.comcastcorporation.com for more information.

@@@@

SANTA CLARA, Calif., Feb. 14, 2017 (GLOBE NEWSWIRE) -- MoSys, Inc. (MOSY), a leader in semiconductor solutions that enable fast, intelligent data access for Cloud, network and communications systems, today announced that as of 5:00 p.m. Eastern Time on February 15, 2017, it will effect a 1-for-10 reverse stock split of its outstanding common stock, which will be effective for trading purposes as of the commencement of trading on February 16, 2017.

The reverse stock split is intended to increase the per share trading price of the Company’s common stock to satisfy the $1.00 minimum bid price requirement for continued listing on The NASDAQ Capital Market (NASDAQ). Trading of the Company’s common stock on NASDAQ will continue, on a post-split basis, with the opening of the markets on February 16, 2017, under the existing trading symbol “MOSY” and under a new CUSIP number, 619718208.  The reverse stock split will reduce the number of outstanding shares of the Company’s common stock from approximately 66 million shares pre-reverse split to approximately 6.6 million shares post-reverse split.

The number of authorized shares of common stock will remain unchanged and the par value per share will be reduced to $0.001. As a result of the reverse stock split, every ten shares of the Company’s pre-reverse split common stock will be combined and reclassified into one share of common stock. Proportionate voting rights and other rights of common stock holders will not be affected by the reverse stock split. No fractional shares will be issued in connection with the reverse stock split; stockholders who would otherwise hold a fractional share of the Company’s common stock will receive cash in an amount equal to the product obtained by multiplying (i) the closing sale price of the common stock on the effective date of the reverse stock split as reported on NASDAQ, by (ii) the number of shares of the common stock held by the stockholder that would otherwise have been exchanged for the fractional share interest.

All stock options and restricted stock units outstanding and common stock reserved for issuance under the Company’s equity incentive plans immediately prior to the reverse stock split will be appropriately adjusted by dividing the number of affected shares of common stock by 10 and, as applicable, multiplying the exercise price by 10, as a result of the reverse stock split.

The Company’s transfer agent, Wells Fargo Shareowner Services, is acting as exchange agent for the reverse stock split and will send instructions to stockholders of record regarding the exchange of certificates for common stock for uncertificated shares of common stock. Stockholders owning shares via a broker or other nominee will have their positions automatically adjusted to reflect the reverse stock split, subject to the brokers' particular processes, and will not be required to take any action in connection with the reverse stock split.

Additional information about the reverse stock split can be found in the Company’s Definitive Proxy Statement filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) on June 6, 2016, a copy of which is available at www.sec.gov or at the Company’s website at www.mosys.com. Additional information regarding this reverse stock split can be found in the Company’s Form 8-K filed with the SEC on February 14, 2017.

About MoSys, Inc.
MoSys, Inc. (MOSY) is a fabless semiconductor company enabling leading equipment manufacturers of Cloud, networking, communications, and data center systems to address the continual increase in Internet users, data and services. The company's solutions deliver data path connectivity, speed and intelligence while eliminating data access bottlenecks on line cards and systems scaling from 100G to multi-terabits per second. Engineered and built for high-reliability carrier and enterprise applications, MoSys' Bandwidth Engine®, Programmable Search Engine, and LineSpeed™ IC product families are based on the company's patented high-performance, high-density intelligent access and high-speed serial interface technology, and utilize the company's highly efficient GigaChip® Interface. MoSys is headquartered in Santa Clara, California. More information is available at www.mosys.com.

@@@@

SOUTH SAN FRANCISCO, Calif., Feb. 10, 2017 (GLOBE NEWSWIRE) -- Catalyst Biosciences, Inc. (CBIO), a clinical-stage biopharmaceutical company focused on developing novel medicines to address hematology indications, today announced a reverse stock split of its shares of common stock at a ratio of one-for-fifteen. The reverse stock split will be effective at 5:00 p.m. Eastern Time on February 10, 2017. At the opening of trading on February 13, 2017, Catalyst’s common stock will begin trading on a split-adjusted basis and the number of shares of Catalyst’s common stock outstanding will decrease from approximately 13.0 million pre-split shares to approximately 868,000 post-split shares.

The primary purpose of the reverse stock split is to enable Catalyst to regain compliance with the $1.00 minimum bid price requirement for continued listing on The Nasdaq Capital Market. Catalyst has until May 30, 2017 to regain compliance with the minimum bid price requirement and has submitted written notice to Nasdaq of its intention to cure the minimum bid price deficiency by effecting a reverse stock split. To regain compliance, the closing bid price of Catalyst’s common stock must be at least $1.00 for a minimum of ten (10) consecutive trading days.

“In the past three months we have presented data supporting the refocused development of our promising hemostasis programs to deliver subcutaneous prophylactic treatment to individuals with hemophilia, and we intend to commence two clinical trials this year,” said Nassim Usman, Ph.D., President and Chief Executive Officer of Catalyst. “We believe that both our Factor VIIa and Factor IX hemophilia product candidates have the properties required, including high potency, to allow for subcutaneous injection with the potential to achieve stable and normal clotting levels.”

Catalyst’s common stock will continue to trade on The Nasdaq Capital Market under the symbol “CBIO.” There will be no change to the Company’s ticker symbol as a result of the reverse stock split. In addition, Catalyst’s common stock will trade under a new CUSIP number 14888D 208 following the reverse stock split.

In the reverse stock split, every fifteen (15) shares of Catalyst’s common stock outstanding will automatically be changed and reclassified into one (1) new share of common stock. Holders of common stock that would otherwise receive a fractional share of common stock pursuant to the reverse stock split will receive cash in lieu of the fractional share. The reverse stock split will affect all Catalyst stockholders uniformly and will not affect any stockholder’s percentage ownership interests in Catalyst (except to the extent that the reverse stock split results in any stockholders owning only a fractional share). Additionally, all Catalyst convertible notes, equity awards and warrants outstanding immediately prior to the reverse stock split will be proportionately adjusted.

Stockholders who hold their shares electronically in book-entry form at a brokerage firm need not take action as their shares will automatically be adjusted by their brokerage firm to reflect the reverse stock split. Beneficial holders may contact their bank, broker or nominee with any questions regarding the procedure of implementing the reverse stock split.

As soon as practicable after the effective time of the reverse stock split, Catalyst or its transfer agent, American Stock Transfer & Trust Company, LLC will mail a letter of transmittal to each stockholder of record. Stockholders holding physical certificates may (but are not required to) send their certificates, along with the properly completed and executed letter of transmittal to American Stock Transfer & Trust Company, LLC at the address given below. The transfer agent will send each stockholder’s new stock certificate and payment in lieu of any fractional share promptly after receipt of that stockholder’s properly completed letter of transmittal and old stock certificates.

Mail:
American Stock Transfer & Trust Company, LLC
Operations Center, Attn: Reorganization Department
6201 15th Avenue
Brooklyn, NY 11219

Phone: 
(800) 937-5449 or (718) 921-8124

Additional information regarding the reverse stock split can be found in Catalyst’s Definitive Proxy Statement on Schedule 14A (Form DEF 14A), filed with the SEC on January 12, 2017, and posted in the "Investors" section of Catalyst’s website at www.catalystbiosciences.com.

About Factor VIIa
Marzeptacog alfa (activated) is a next-generation Factor VIIa that successfully completed an intravenous Phase 1 clinical trial in severe hemophilia A and B with and without inhibitors. Marzeptacog alfa (activated) is being developed for the prophylactic treatment of severe hemophilia patients with inhibitors. Marzeptacog alfa (activated) was designed to combine higher clot-generating activity at the site of bleeding and improved duration of action.

About Factor IX 
CB 2679d/ISU304 is a next-generation coagulation Factor IX variant that is in advanced preclinical development. CB 2679d/ISU304 has exhibited enhanced procoagulant activity, improved efficacy in inhibiting blood loss, and prolonged duration of action in bleeding and non-bleeding preclinical models compared to other Factor IX products on the market and in development. Catalyst believes that CB 2679d/ISU304 may allow for subcutaneous prophylactic treatment of individuals with hemophilia B. Catalyst has a collaboration with ISU Abxis to advance the development of CB 2679d/ISU304 through a Phase 1/2 proof-of-concept study in individuals with hemophilia B. After Phase 1, ISU Abxis retains exclusive commercial rights in South Korea while Catalyst retains full development and commercial rights for CB 2679d/ISU304 outside of South Korea.

About Catalyst 
Catalyst is a clinical-stage biopharmaceutical company focused on developing novel medicines to address hematology indications. Catalyst is focused on the field of hemostasis, including the subcutaneous prophylaxis of hemophilia and facilitating surgery in individuals with hemophilia. Catalyst’s most advanced program is a potent next-generation coagulation Factor VIIa variant, marzeptacog alfa (activated), that has successfully completed an intravenous Phase 1 clinical trial in individuals with severe hemophilia A or B. Catalyst is also developing a next-generation Factor IX variant, CB 2679d/ISU304, that is in advanced preclinical development. For more information, please visit www.catalystbiosciences.com.

Forward-Looking Statements
This press release contains forward-looking statements that involve substantial risks and uncertainties. All statements, other than statement of historical facts, included in this press release regarding our strategy, future operations, and plans are forward-looking statements. Examples of such statements include, but are not limited to, statements relating to Catalyst’s clinical trial timelines, including the anticipated initiation two trials in 2017, the potential uses and benefits of subcutaneously dosed CB 2679d/ISU304 and marzeptacog alfa (activated) and the continued trading of Catalyst’s common stock on The Nasdaq Capital Market. Actual results or events could differ materially from the plans, intentions, expectations and projections disclosed in the forward-looking statements. Various important factors could cause actual results or events to differ materially from the forward-looking statements that Catalyst makes, including, but not limited to, the risk that trials and studies may be delayed and may not have satisfactory outcomes, that human trials will not replicate the results from animal studies, that potential adverse effects may arise from the testing or use of Catalyst’s products, including the generation of antibodies, the risk that costs required to develop or manufacture Catalyst’s products will be higher than anticipated, competition, changes in the market price of our common stock due to market volatility or fluctuations in our operating results  and other factors described in the “Risk Factors” section of the Company’s most recent Annual Report on Form 10-K and subsequent Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q filed with the SEC. Catalyst does not assume any obligation to update any forward-looking statements, except as required by law.

@@@@

REDWOOD CITY, Calif.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--

Support.com, Inc. (SPRT), makers of Support.com® Cloud software for Support Interaction Optimization, and a leading provider of tech support and turnkey support center services, today announced that a 1-for-3 reverse stock split of its common stock will be effective at 12:01a.m. Eastern Standard Time on Friday, January 20, 2017. Trading of the Company’s common stock on The NASDAQ Capital Market will continue, on a post-split basis, with the opening of the markets on Friday, January 20, 2017, under the existing trading symbol “SPRT” and under new CUSIP number 86858W200.

As previously announced, the Company’s stockholders approved a proposal authorizing the Company’s Board of Directors, in its discretion, to effect a reverse stock split of the Company’s outstanding shares of common stock at a ratio ranging from 1-for-3 to 1-for-7 to be determined by the Board, and effected, if at all, within one year from the date of the stockholder approval. On December 9, 2016, the Board approved a 1-for-3 reverse stock split of the common stock and approved the filing of a Certificate of Amendment to the Restated Certificate of Incorporation of the Company to effectuate the reverse stock split. The reverse stock split is intended to increase the per share trading price of the Company’s common stock to satisfy the $1.00 minimum bid price requirement for continued listing on The NASDAQ Capital Market.

As a result of the reverse stock split, every three (3) shares of the Company’s outstanding common stock will be converted into one (1) share of common stock, without any change in the par value per share. Fractional shares will not be issued as a result of the reverse stock split; instead, holders of pre-reverse stock split shares of the Company’s common stock who otherwise would have been entitled to receive a fractional share will receive a cash payment in lieu of such fractional share.

The number of issued and outstanding shares of the Company’s common stock will be reduced from approximately 55,652,323 shares to approximately 18,550,774 shares, and the number of authorized shares of common stock will be reduced from 150,000,000 shares to 50,000,000 shares. The number of authorized shares of preferred stock will remain the same. The reverse stock split will also affect the Company’s outstanding stock options and other exercisable or convertible instruments and will result in the shares underlying such instruments being reduced and the exercise price being increased proportionately to the reverse stock split ratio.

The Company’s transfer agent, Computershare Trust Company, N.A., will act as exchange agent for the reverse stock split and will send instructions to stockholders of record regarding the exchange of certificates for common stock.

The Company will post a Reverse Stock Split FAQ on its website at www.support.com

About Support.com

Support.com, Inc. (SPRT) is the leading provider of cloud-based software and services to deliver next-generation technical support. Support.com helps leading brands in software, electronics, communications, retail, Internet of Things (IoT) and other connected technology industries deepen their customer relationships. Customers want technology that works the way it’s intended. By using Support.com software and services, companies can deliver a fantastic customer experience, leading to happier customers, greater brand loyalty and growing revenues.

For more information, please visit http://www.support.com or follow us @support_com.

Support.com, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer. For more information, visit http://www.support.com/about-us/careers.

© 2016 Support.com, Inc. All rights reserved. Support.com and the Support.com logo are trademarks or registered trademarks of Support.com, Inc. in the United States and other countries. All other marks are the property of their respective owners.

Safe Harbor for Forward-Looking Statements

This document contains “forward-looking statements” as defined under the U.S. federal securities laws, including the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, and is subject to the safe harbors created by such laws. Forward-looking statements include, for example, all statements relating to stock price performance and future performance in economic and other terms. Such forward-looking statements are based on current expectations that involve a number of uncertainties and risks that may cause actual events or results to differ materially from those indicated by such forward-looking statements, including, among others, market reaction to the reverse stock split and our ability to maintain and grow revenue. These and other risks may be detailed from time to time in Support.com’s periodic reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including, but not limited to, its latest Annual Report on Form 10-K and its latest Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q, copies of which may be obtained from www.sec.gov. Support.com assumes no obligation to update its forward-looking statements, except as may otherwise be required by the federal securities laws.


View source version on businesswire.com: http://www.businesswire.com/news/home/20170113005733/en/

@@@@

ATHENS, GREECE--(Marketwired - Jan 19, 2017) -  DryShips Inc. ( NASDAQ : DRYS ) (the "Company" or "DryShips"), a diversified owner of ocean group cargo vessels, announced today that its Board of Directors (the "Board") has determined to effect a 1-for-8 reverse stock split of the Company's common shares. At the Company's annual general meeting of shareholders on October 26, 2016, the Company's shareholders approved the reverse stock split and granted the Board, or a duly constituted committee thereof, the authority to determine the exact split ratio and proceed with the reverse stock split.

The reverse stock split will take effect, and the Company's common stock will begin trading on a split-adjusted basis on the Nasdaq Capital Market, as of the opening of trading on January 23, 2017 under the existing trading symbol "DRYS". The new CUSIP number for the common stock following the reverse stock split is Y2109Q408.

When the reverse stock split becomes effective, every 8 shares of the Company's issued common stock will be automatically combined into one issued share of common stock. As of the date of this press release, the Company had 69,357,841 common shares issued. Effecting the reverse stock split will reduce the number of issued common shares from 69,357,841 shares to approximately 8.7 million shares. 

No fractional shares will be issued in connection with the reverse split of the issued common stock. Shareholders who would otherwise hold a fractional share of the Company's common stock will receive a cash payment in lieu thereof at a price equal to that fraction to which the shareholder would otherwise be entitled multiplied by the closing price of the Company's common stock on the Nasdaq Capital Market on January 20, 2017.

Shareholders with shares held in book-entry form or through a bank, broker, or other nominee are not required to take any action and will see the impact of the reverse stock split reflected in their accounts on or after January 23, 2017. Such beneficial holders may contact their bank, broker, or nominee for more information.

Shareholders with shares held in certificate form will receive instructions from the Company's exchange agent, American Stock Transfer & Trust Company, LLC, for exchanging their stock certificates for a new certificate representing the shares of common stock resulting from the reverse split.

Additional information about the reverse stock split can be found in the Company's proxy statement furnished to the Securities and Exchange Commission on September 23, 2016, a copy of which is available on the Commission's website at www.sec.gov.  

About DryShips

DryShips Inc. is an owner of drybulk carriers and offshore support vessels that operate worldwide. DryShips owns a fleet of 13 Panamax drybulk carriers with a combined deadweight tonnage of approximately 1.0 million tons, and 6 offshore supply vessels, comprised of 2 platform supply and 4 oil spill recovery vessels.

DryShips' common stock is listed on the NASDAQ Capital Market where it trades under the symbol "DRYS."

Visit the Company's website at www.dryships.com. The information contained on the Company's website does not constitute a part of this press release.

Forward-Looking Statements

Matters discussed in this release may constitute forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 provides safe harbor protections for forward-looking statements in order to encourage companies to provide prospective information about their business. The Company desires to take advantage of the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 and is including this cautionary statement in connection with such safe harbor legislation.

Forward-looking statements reflect our current views with respect to future events and financial performance and may include statements concerning plans, objectives, goals, strategies, future events or performance, and underlying assumptions and other statements, which are other than statements of historical facts.

The forward-looking statements in this release are based upon various assumptions, many of which are based, in turn, upon further assumptions, including without limitation, management's examination of historical operating trends, data contained in our records and other data available from third parties. Although we believe that these assumptions were reasonable when made, because these assumptions are inherently subject to significant uncertainties and contingencies which are difficult or impossible to predict and are beyond our control, we cannot assure you that it will achieve or accomplish these expectations, beliefs or projections.

Important factors that, in the Company's view, could cause actual results to differ materially from those discussed in the forward-looking statements include the factors related to the strength of world economies and currencies, general market conditions, including changes in charter rates and vessel values, failure of a seller or shipyard to deliver one or more vessels, failure of a buyer to accept delivery of a vessel, our inability to procure acquisition financing, default by one or more charterers of our ships, changes in demand for drybulk or LPG commodities, changes in demand that may affect attitudes of time charterers, scheduled and unscheduled drydocking, changes in our voyage and operating expenses, including bunker prices, dry-docking and insurance costs, changes in governmental rules and regulations, changes in our relationships with the lenders under our debt agreements, potential liability from pending or future litigation, domestic and international political conditions, potential disruption of shipping routes due to accidents, international hostilities and political events or acts by terrorists.

Risks and uncertainties are further described in reports filed by DryShips Inc. with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission, including the Company's most recently filed Annual Report on Form 20-F.

@@@@

IRVINE, Calif.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--

First Foundation Inc. (FFWM), a financial services company with two wholly-owned operating subsidiaries, First Foundation Advisors and First Foundation Bank, today announced that its Board of Directors has declared a two-for-one stock split to be effected in the form of a stock dividend on its common stock. Stockholders of record as of the close of business on January 4, 2017 will be entitled to receive one additional share of First Foundation common stock for each share of common stock held. The additional shares issued in the stock split are expected to be distributed on January 18, 2017.

"First Foundation continues to demonstrate solid financial performance and generate value for our existing stockholders," said Scott F. Kavanaugh, CEO. "As we seek to expand our investor base, the stock split is further testament to the strength of our platform and our commitment to the strategic growth of the company."

About First Foundation

First Foundation, a financial institution founded in 1990, provides private wealth management, personal banking, and business banking. The Company has offices in California, Nevada, and Hawaii with headquarters in Irvine, California. For more information, please visit www.ff-inc.com.

Forward Looking Statements

This news release includes certain forward-looking statements about First Foundation and its pending stock split that are intended to be covered by the safe harbor provided in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. All statements other than statements of historical fact are forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements often include words such as “believe,” “expect,” “anticipate,” “intend,” “plan,” “estimate,” “project,” or words of similar meaning, or future or conditional verbs such as “will,” “would,” “should,” “could,” or “may.” Forward-looking statements should not be relied on, because they involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors, some of which are beyond the control of the Company. These risks, uncertainties and other factors may cause the actual results, performance or achievements of the Company to be materially different from the anticipated future results, performance or achievements expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements.


View source version on businesswire.com: http://www.businesswire.com/news/home/20161222005079/en/

@@@@

EDEN PRAIRIE, Minn., Jan. 12, 2017 (GLOBE NEWSWIRE) -- Sunshine Heart, Inc. today announced a 1-for-30 reverse split of its common stock, effective at 5:00 pm Eastern time today. Beginning tomorrow, January 13, 2017, the Company’s common stock will trade on The Nasdaq Capital Market on a split adjusted basis.

At Sunshine Heart’s special meeting of stockholders on January 9, 2017, the Company’s stockholders authorized the Board of Directors to amend the Fourth Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation, as amended, of the Company to effect a reverse stock split at a ratio in the range of 1-for-20 to 1-for-60, as determined at the discretion of the Company’s Board of Directors.

Upon effectiveness, the reverse stock split will cause a reduction in the number of shares of common stock outstanding and issuable upon the conversion of the Company’s outstanding shares of preferred stock and the exercise of its outstanding stock options and warrants in proportion to the ratio of the reverse split, and will cause a proportionate increase in the conversion and exercise prices of such preferred stock, stock options and warrants. The number of shares of common stock issuable upon the exercise or vesting of outstanding stock options and warrants will be rounded down to the nearest whole share.

The Company’s common stock will continue to trade on The Nasdaq Capital Market under the symbol “SSH.” The new CUSIP number for the common stock following the reverse split is 86782U 304.

The number of authorized shares of the Company’s common stock will remain at 100,000,000, while the number of outstanding shares will be reduced from approximately 25.3 million to 0.8 million. No fractional shares will be issued following the reverse stock split.

Additional information about the reverse stock split can be found in the Company’s definitive proxy statement filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on December 8, 2016, a copy of which is also available on the Company’s website under the Investors page.

About Sunshine Heart

Sunshine Heart, Inc. (SSH) is an early-stage medical device company focused on developing a product portfolio to treat moderate to severe heart failure and related conditions. The Company’s commercial product, the Aquadex system, is indicated for temporary (up to eight hours) ultrafiltration treatment of patients with fluid overload who have failed diuretic therapy, and extended (longer than 8 hours) ultrafiltration treatment of patients with fluid overload who have failed diuretic therapy and require hospitalization. Our objective is to improve the quality of life for heart failure patients and slow the disease progression. Sunshine Heart is a Delaware corporation headquartered in Minneapolis with wholly owned subsidiaries in Australia and Ireland. The Company has been listed on the NASDAQ Capital Market since February 2012.

Forward-Looking Statements

Certain statements in this release are forward-looking statements that are based on management’s beliefs, assumptions, expectations, and information currently available to management. All statements that address future operating performance, events or developments that we expect or anticipate will occur in the future are forward-looking statements, including without limitation, clinical and pre-clinical study designs and activities, expected timing for initiation, enrollment and completion of clinical trials, research and development activities, ultimate clinical outcomes and benefits of our products to patients, design and development of future studies, site activations, patient enrollment in studies, timing of regulatory filings and approvals, regulatory acceptance of our filings, our expectations with respect to product development and commercialization efforts, market and physician acceptance of our products, intellectual property protection, our ability to integrate acquired businesses, our expectations regarding anticipated synergies with and benefits from acquired businesses, potentially competitive product offerings, the Company’s ability to receive an extension from Nasdaq. The risk factors described in our filings with the SEC could cause actual events to adversely differ from the expectations indicated in these forward-looking statements. Management believes that these forward-looking statements are reasonable as and when made. However, you should not place undue reliance on forward-looking statements because they speak only as of the date when made. Sunshine Heart does not assume any obligation to publicly update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise.  Sunshine Heart may not actually achieve the plans, projections or expectations disclosed in forward-looking statements, and actual results, developments or events could differ materially from those disclosed in the forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements are subject to a number of risks and uncertainties, including without limitation, the possibility that regulatory authorities do not accept our application or approve the marketing of our therapy, the possibility we may be unable to raise the funds necessary for the development and commercialization of our therapy and other risks and uncertainties described in our filings with the SEC. We do not assume any obligation to publicly update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise.

@@@@

GERMANTOWN, Md., Jan. 06, 2017 (GLOBE NEWSWIRE) -- Neuralstem, Inc. (CUR), a biopharmaceutical company focused on the development of central nervous system therapies based on its neural stem cell technology, today announced a reverse stock split of its shares of common stock at a ratio of 1-for-13. The reverse stock split will become effective on Friday, January 6, 2017 after market close and shares of Neuralstem Inc. common stock will trade on a post-split basis on the Nasdaq Capital Market under the Company’s existing trading symbol, “CUR,” at the market open on Monday, January 9, 2017.

The reverse stock split enables Neuralstem to regain compliance with the $1.00 minimum bid price condition and thereby fulfill all of the NASDAQ Capital Market continued listing requirements.

“The reverse split along with the recent $20 million strategic investment has increased our shareholder equity, strengthened our capital structure, and allows us to satisfy all the Nasdaq listing requirements,” commented Rich Daly, Chairman and CEO, Neuralstem.  “Over the last year we have continued to execute on the new operational and clinical strategy to help increase shareholder confidence and interest in Neuralstem.  We look forward to focusing on providing our Phase 2 MDD clinical trial results this year.”

At the effect time of the reverse stock split, every thirteen (13) shares of Neuralstem common stock will be combined into one (1) share of common stock.  This will reduce the Company’s issued and outstanding common stock from approximately 143,427,149 million shares to approximately 11,032,858 million shares. Fractional shares will be rounded up to the nearest whole share and proportional adjustments will be made to the Company's outstanding stock options, warrants and equity incentive plans. The reverse stock split will not materially affect any stockholder's ownership percentage of the Company's common stock.

Additional information regarding Neuralstem Inc.’s reverse stock split is available in the definitive proxy statement, filed August 1, 2016, and the Current Report on Form 8-K to be filed with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission.

About Neuralstem

Neuralstem’s patented technology enables the commercial-scale production of multiple types of central nervous system stem cells, which are being developed as potential therapies for multiple central nervous system diseases and conditions.

Neuralstem’s technology enables the generation of small molecule compounds by screening hippocampal stem cell lines with its proprietary systematic chemical screening process.  The screening process has led to the discovery and patenting of molecules that Neuralstem believes may stimulate the brain’s capacity to generate new neurons, potentially reversing pathophysiologies associated with certain central nervous system (CNS) conditions.

The company has completed Phase 1a and 1b trials evaluating NSI-189, a novel neurogenic small molecule product candidate, for the treatment of major depressive disorder or MDD, and is currently conducting a Phase 2 efficacy study for MDD.

Neuralstem’s stem cell therapy product candidate, NSI-566, is a spinal cord-derived neural stem cell line. Neuralstem is currently evaluating NSI-566 in three indications: stroke, chronic spinal cord injury (cSCI), and Amyotrophic Lateral Sclerosis (ALS).

Neuralstem is conducting a Phase 1 safety study for the treatment of paralysis from chronic motor stroke at the BaYi Brain Hospital in Beijing, China.  In addition, NSI-566 was evaluated in a Phase 1 safety study to treat paralysis due to chronic spinal cord injury as well as a Phase 1 and Phase 2a risk escalation, safety trials for ALS.  Patients from all three indications are currently in long-term observational follow-up periods to continue to monitor safety and possible therapeutic benefits.

Cautionary Statement Regarding Forward Looking Information

This news release contains “forward-looking statements” made pursuant to the “safe harbor” provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Such forward-looking statements relate to future, not past, events and may often be identified by words such as “expect,” “anticipate,” “intend,” “plan,” “believe,” “seek” or “will.” Forward-looking statements by their nature address matters that are, to different degrees, uncertain. Specific risks and uncertainties that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those expressed in our forward-looking statements include risks inherent in the development and commercialization of potential products, uncertainty of clinical trial results or regulatory approvals or clearances, need for future capital, dependence upon collaborators and maintenance of our intellectual property rights. Actual results may differ materially from the results anticipated in these forward-looking statements. Additional information on potential factors that could affect our results and other risks and uncertainties are detailed from time to time in Neuralstem’s periodic reports, including the Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2015, and Form 10-Q for the nine months ended September 30, 2016, filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC), and in other reports filed with the SEC. We do not assume any obligation to update any forward-looking statements.

@@@@

ENGLEWOOD, Colo., Dec. 29, 2016 (GLOBE NEWSWIRE) -- Gevo, Inc. (GEVO) announced today that it will effect a 1-for-20 reverse stock split previously approved by the Company's stockholders at a special meeting held on December 14, 2016. The 1-for-20 reverse stock split will be effective as of the close of business on January 5, 2017 and the Company's common stock will begin trading on a split-adjusted basis on Friday, January 6, 2017.

Proportional adjustments will be made to the conversion and exercise prices of the Company's outstanding warrants, convertible notes and stock options, and to the number of shares issued and issuable under the Company's equity compensation plans. The number of authorized shares of the Company's common stock will remain 250 million shares.

The reverse stock split is intended to increase the market price per share of the Company's common stock to allow the Company to maintain the listing of its common stock on The NASDAQ Capital Market. The Company's common stock will continue to trade on The NASDAQ Capital Market under the symbol "GEVO."  The new CUSIP number for the common stock following the reverse stock split will be 374396307.

Information for Stockholders

Upon the effectiveness of the reverse stock split, each twenty shares of the Company's issued and outstanding common stock will be automatically combined and converted into one issued and outstanding share of common stock, par value $0.01 per share. The Company will not issue any fractional shares in connection with the reverse stock split.  Instead, fractional share interests will be rounded up to the next largest whole number.  The reverse stock split will not modify the rights or preferences of the common stock.

The Company's transfer agent, American Stock Transfer & Trust Company, LLC, will act as its exchange agent for the reverse stock split.  American Stock Transfer & Trust Company, LLC will provide stockholders of record holding certificates representing pre-split shares of the Company's common stock as of the effective date a letter of transmittal providing instructions for the exchange of shares.  Registered stockholders holding pre-split shares of the Company's common stock electronically in book-entry form are not required to take any action to receive post-split shares. Stockholders owning shares via a broker or other nominee will have their positions automatically adjusted to reflect the reverse stock split, subject to brokers' particular processes, and will not be required to take any action in connection with the reverse stock split.  American Stock Transfer & Trust Company, LLC can be reached at (877) 248-6417 or (718) 921-8317.

Additional information about the reverse stock split can be found in the Company's definitive proxy statement filed with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission on October 31, 2016, a copy of which is available at www.sec.gov or at www.gevo.com under the SEC Filings tab located on the Investors page.

About Gevo

Gevo is a renewable technology, chemical products, and next generation biofuels company. Gevo has developed proprietary technology that uses a combination of synthetic biology, metabolic engineering, chemistry and chemical engineering to focus primarily on the production of isobutanol, as well as related products from renewable feedstocks. Gevo’s strategy is to commercialize bio-based alternatives to petroleum-based products to allow for the optimization of fermentation facilities’ assets, with the ultimate goal of maximizing cash flows from the operation of those assets. Gevo produces isobutanol, ethanol and high-value animal feed at its fermentation plant in Luverne, Minnesota. Gevo has also developed technology to produce hydrocarbon products from renewable alcohols. Gevo currently operates a biorefinery in Silsbee, Texas, in collaboration with South Hampton Resources Inc., to produce renewable jet fuel, octane, and ingredients for plastics like polyester. Gevo has a marquee list of partners including The Coca-Cola Company, Toray Industries Inc. and Total SA, among others. Gevo is committed to a sustainable bio-based economy that meets society’s needs for plentiful food and clean air and water.

Forward-Looking Statements

Certain statements in this press release may constitute "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These forward-looking statements, which include statements relating to the effectiveness of the reverse stock split, are made on the basis of the current beliefs, expectations and assumptions of the management of Gevo and are subject to significant risks and uncertainty. Investors are cautioned not to place undue reliance on any such forward-looking statements. All such forward-looking statements speak only as of the date they are made, and Gevo undertakes no obligation to update or revise these statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise. Although Gevo believes that the expectations reflected in these forward-looking statements are reasonable, these statements involve many risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results to differ materially from what may be expressed or implied in these forward-looking statements. For a further discussion of risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ from those expressed in these forward-looking statements, as well as risks relating to the business of Gevo in general, see the risk disclosures in the Annual Report on Form 10-K of Gevo for the year ended December 31, 2015, and in subsequent reports on Forms 10-Q and 8-K and other filings made with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission by Gevo.